Utah statutes.
61-2c-501.5.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Civil judgment" means a judgment in a civil action that:
(a)  is awarded in an action brought against a real estate licensee on the
basis of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in a residential mortgage loan
transaction; and
(b)  awards actual damages.
(2)  "Criminal restitution judgment" means a judgment that, in accordance with
the Utah Code of Criminal Procedure, orders criminal restitution to a person
and against a real estate licensee for a criminal offense involving fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit in a residential mortgage loan transaction.
(3)  "Final judgment" means one of the following judgments upon termination of
the proceedings related to the judgment, including appeals:
(a)  a civil judgment; or
(b)  a criminal restitution judgment.
(4)  "Fund" means the Residential Mortgage Loan Education, Research, and
Recovery Fund created in Section 61-2c-501.
